District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0028.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
21 act may be cited as the “Eliminating Restrictive and Segregated Enclosures (“ERASE”) Solitary
22 Confinement Act of 2025”.
23 Sec. 2. Definitions.
1

24 For purposes of this act, the term:
25 (a) “Appropriate healthcare” means the right to:
26 (1) Timely, responsive, respectful, and dignified attention to a resident’s
27 healthcare needs by a qualified health professional;
28 (2) Assessment, consultation, and provision of health care consistent with the
29 standard of care expected to be provided by a reasonably prudent qualified health professional in
30 the professional’s specialty area, and not limited in any way because of status as a detained or
31 incarcerated person;
32 (3) Have the qualified health professional respect a resident's privacy and
33 confidentiality;
34 (4) Privacy and protection from inquiry by qualified health professionals
35 regarding a resident’s charges, convictions, or duration of sentences unless expressly pertinent to
36 the delivery of care;
37 (5) Freedom from physical restraints while receiving any form of healthcare,
38 unless the treating qualified health professional requests physical restraints to address a specific
39 safety concern;
40 (6) Obtain, at no cost, at the conclusion of a resident’s visit to a qualified health
41 professional providing services outside of a penal institution, copies of all records of the
42 resident’s own diagnoses, test results, treatment instructions, recommendations for further
43 treatment and evaluation, and other documents that a person who is not detained or incarcerated
44 would have a right to obtain from a qualified health professional;
45 (7) Obtain, at no cost, full or partial copies of a resident’s own medical records
46 that are created by or in the possession of either the Department or the entity providing health
2

47 care on behalf of the Department, upon the request of a resident, former resident, or a resident or
48 former resident’s counsel without having to file a request under the District of Columbia
49 Freedom of Information Act, D.C. Code § 2-531;
50 (8) A reasonable opportunity to discuss with a qualified health professional the
51 benefits and risks of treatment alternatives, including the risks and benefits of forgoing
52 treatment, and guidance about different courses of action;
53 (9) Ask questions about health status or recommended treatment and to have those
54 questions answered by a qualified health professional;
55 (10) Make decisions about the care they receive and have those decisions
56 respected;
57 (11) Be advised of any conflicts of interest a qualified health professional may
58 have with respect to a resident’s care;
59 (12) Obtain a second opinion from a qualified health professional providing
60 services outside of the penal institution in the same or similar specialty within a reasonable
61 amount of time in cases involving a serious risk of death or serious bodily injury;
62 (13) Coordination and integration of the care provided by a resident’s qualified
63 health professionals, including the timely provision of care by a suitable qualified health
64 professional outside of the penal institution as necessary; and
65 (14) Visitation with a resident’s “attorney in fact,” as defined in D.C. Code § 21-
66 2202.1, for the purpose of healthcare decision making, regardless of any Department policy to
67 the contrary;
68 (15) All rights enumerated in the Consumers’ Bill of Rights at D.C. Code § 7-
69 1231.04;
3

70 (16) Communication pursuant to the DC Language Access Act at D.C. Code § 2
71 1901 et seq; and
72 (17) Effective communication pursuant to Title II and Title III of the Americans
73 with Disabilities Act at 42 U.S.C. §§ 12131-34 and 12181-89.
74 (b) “Chemical restraint” means a medication that is used in addition to or in place of the
75 resident’s regular, prescribed drug regimen to control extreme behavior during an emergency,
76 but does not include medications that comprise the resident’s regular, prescribed medical
77 regimen and that are part of the resident’s treatment, even if the intended purpose is to control
78 ongoing behavior;
79 (c) “Department” means the Department of Corrections, as defined in D.C. Code § 24-
80 211.01;
81 (d) “Disciplinary housing” means the separation of a resident from other individuals for
82 the purpose of punishing the resident for a violation of the Department’s or penal institution’s
83 rules;
84 (e) “Health care” means any type of care provided by a person licensed under or
85 permitted to practice a health occupation in the District as defined in D.C. Code § 3-1201 et seq.
86 Healthcare includes medical care, dental care, vision care, psychiatric care, psychological or
87 other treatment for mental or behavioral health conditions, physical therapy, occupational
88 therapy, chronic care, and the provision of medication or medical supplies;
89 (f) “Medical isolation” means the isolation of a resident consistent with a finding by a
90 qualified health professional that the resident has a communicable disease for which the Centers
91 for Disease Control and Prevention recommends or authorizes isolation or quarantine, and that
92 isolation is medically necessary for that resident’s treatment or to protect other residents or staff
4

93 from the communicable disease;
94 (g) “Minimum out-of-cell time” means at least 8 hours daily, between 8 a.m. and 8 p.m.,
95 during which a resident is not restricted to their cell and has the opportunity to move around a
96 shared space, interact with other residents in a shared space without barriers or physical or
97 chemical restraints, participate in programming, shower, or go to the commissary, gym, and
98 recreation yard, or participate in other activities normally conducted outside of a resident’s cell;
99 (h) “Penal institution” means any penitentiary, prison, jail, or correctional facility owned,
100 operated, or controlled by the Department;
101 (i) “Physical restraint” means any mechanical device, material, or equipment attached or
102 adjacent to the resident’s body, or any manual method, that the resident cannot easily remove
103 and which restricts their freedom of movement or normal access to their body;
104 (j) “Prolonged confinement” means the denial of minimum out-of-cell time, without a
105 resident’s informed written consent;
106 (k) “Punitive measures” means the loss of any privilege, including video and phone calls,
107 recreation, reading materials, mail, or commissary, that is standardly provided to residents;
108 (l) “Qualified health professional” means a person licensed under or permitted to practice
109 a health occupation in the District as defined by D.C. Code § 3-1201.08 who is providing
110 services or treatment for which the individual is specifically licensed or is permitted to perform
111 pursuant to D.C. Code § 3-1201 et seq.;
112 (m) “Resident” means any individual detained or incarcerated at a penal institution;
113 (n) “Safe cell” means a suicide-resistant housing cell designed to prevent a resident from
114 inflicting serious bodily injury upon themselves or used by the Department as a place to hold and
115 continuously monitor residents placed on suicide watch;
5

116 (o) “Serious bodily injury” means a bodily injury or significant bodily injury that
117 involves a substantial risk of death, protracted and obvious disfigurement, protracted loss or
118 impairment of the function of a bodily member or organ, or protracted loss of consciousness;
119 (p) “Suicide precaution” means a measure used to observe a resident who is assessed by a
120 qualified health professional and determined to not be actively suicidal, but expresses suicidal
121 ideation or has a recent prior history of inflicting or attempting to inflict serious bodily injury
122 upon themselves, or a resident who denies suicidal ideation or does not threaten suicide, but
123 demonstrates other concerning behavior indicating the potential for inflicting death or serious
124 bodily injury upon themselves; and
125 (q) “Suicide watch” means a measure used to observe a resident who is assessed by a
126 qualified health professional and determined to be actively suicidal, by either threatening or
127 engaging in inflicting serious bodily injury upon themselves.
128 Sec. 3. Scope.
129 This act shall apply to all residents detained or incarcerated at the Central Detention
130 Facility, the Correctional Treatment Facility, the Central Cell Block, and any other penal
131 institution owned, operated, or controlled by the Department.
132 Sec. 4. Limitations on the Use of Prolonged Confinement.
133 (a) The Department shall provide appropriate healthcare to all residents, including those
134 subject to disciplinary housing, medical isolation, suicide precaution, and suicide watch.
135 (b) Except as provided in subsections (c) and (d) of this section, the Department shall not
136 use or impose any form of prolonged confinement on any resident for any purpose, including
137 discipline, safety, security, administrative convenience, placement on a medical or mental health
138 unit, health care need, or the prevention of suicide or self-harm.
6

139 (c) A resident in medical isolation may be subject to prolonged confinement, but only for
140 the time necessary to ensure the resident is no longer contagious or transmitting a communicable
141 disease.
142 (d) A qualified health professional shall reevaluate whether medical isolation is necessary
143 at an interval in accordance with guidance issued by the Centers for Disease Control and
144 Prevention or, at a minimum, every 24 hours.
145 (e) When a qualified health professional determines the resident is no longer contagious,
146 the resident shall be immediately entitled to minimum out-of-cell time, even if they remain
147 housed in a medical isolation unit.
148 (f) The removal of personal property items from a resident shall be prohibited absent an
149 individualized determination by a qualified health professional that the removal of a particular
150 item is necessary to prevent the transmitting of a communicable disease.
151 (g) A resident placed on suicide watch may be placed in prolonged confinement, subject
152 to the provisions of Section 5 of this Chapter.
153 (h) If the Department takes possession of a resident’s personal property when moving the
154 resident to or from disciplinary housing, the Department shall return all personal property to the
155 resident within 6 hours of taking possession of the property, excluding any contraband as defined
156 in D.C. Code § 22-2603.02.
157 (i) Punitive measures may only be applied to a resident in response to a disciplinary
158 finding.
159 (j) At intake, and any time a resident is placed in prolonged confinement, medical
160 isolation, disciplinary housing, or under suicide precaution or suicide watch, the Department
161 shall provide the resident educational materials on mental health and substance use disorders, the
7

162 stigma around mental health and substance use disorders, the mental health and substance use
163 disorder treatment options available to residents from the Department, and the law, regulations,
164 and policy statements governing the use of prolonged confinement, medical isolation,
165 disciplinary housing, and suicide precaution or suicide watch. The Department shall make these
166 educational materials available within 2 hours of the intake or placement in written format, both
167 hard copy and electronic, and in video format. These educational materials must comply with the
168 DC Language Access Act at D.C. Code § 2-1901 et seq.
169 (k) The Department shall notify a resident’s counsel of record any time a resident is
170 placed in prolonged confinement, medical isolation, disciplinary housing, or under suicide
171 precaution or suicide watch. If the resident does not have a counsel of record, the Department
172 shall notify the Public Defender Service for the District of Columbia.
173 Sec. 5. Limitations on the use of prolonged confinement.
174 (a) Department staff shall directly observe a resident on suicide precaution at staggered
175 intervals not to exceed every 15 minutes and document those observations.
176 (b) Department staff shall directly observe a resident on suicide watch continuously and
177 without interruption and document those observations every 15 minutes.
178 (c) Supervision aids, like cameras, can be utilized as a supplement to, but never as a
179 substitute for, direct observation by Department staff of a resident on suicide precaution or
180 suicide watch.
181 (d) A resident on suicide precaution shall never be placed in a safe cell and shall not be
182 subject to prolonged confinement or punitive measures.
183 (e) All residents on suicide precaution or suicide watch shall be entitled to attend all court
184 or parole hearings unless a qualified health practitioner makes a finding that non-attendance is
8

185 immediately necessary to prevent a risk of death or serious bodily injury to the resident or
186 another person.
187 (f) A resident on suicide watch shall reside in the least restrictive setting necessary to
188 reasonably assure the safety of the resident and others, as determined by a qualified health
189 professional, including housing in the general population, mental health unit, or medical
190 infirmary.
191 (g) A resident on suicide watch may be placed in a safe cell only if it is immediately
192 necessary to prevent death or serious bodily injury.
193 (h) A qualified health professional shall directly observe any resident in a safe cell a
194 minimum of every 4 hours and shall formally reassess the resident at least every 24 hours.
195 (i) Removal of a resident’s clothing shall be prohibited absent an individualized
196 determination by a qualified health professional that such removal is necessary to prevent death
197 or serious bodily injury. If the individualized determination to remove a resident’s clothing is
198 made, the resident shall immediately be provided with alternative safe clothing and blanket, and
199 a qualified health professional shall reassess the determination at least every 24 hours. A resident
200 shall never be without the clothing and blankets necessary to provide reasonable privacy and
201 warmth.
202 (j) The Department shall transfer a resident from a safe cell to a local hospital or another
203 appropriate healthcare facility as soon as practicable:
204 (1) Upon a determination by a qualified health care professional that the
205 Department cannot provide the resident with appropriate healthcare;
206 (2) If the resident has been held in a safe cell continuously for 48 hours; or
207 (3) Upon request of the resident.
9

208 (k) The Department shall examine any incident involving a completed suicide and any
209 incident involving a suicide attempt requiring hospitalization through a morbidity and mortality
210 review process, which shall be completed within 30 days of the resident’s death or suicide
211 attempt.
212 (l) The review, separate and apart from other formal investigations that may be required
213 to determine the cause of death, shall include:
214 (1) Review of the circumstances surrounding the incident;
215 (2) Review of procedures relevant to the incident;
216 (3) Review of all relevant training received by involved staff;
217 (4) Review of pertinent healthcare services reports involving the resident;
218 (5) Review of any possible precipitating factors that may have caused the resident
219 to commit suicide or suffer a serious suicide attempt;
220 (6) Recommendations, if any, for changes in policy, training, physical plant,
221 healthcare services, and operational procedures; and
222 (7) A written report detailing the Department’s findings, including whether each
223 recommendation was accepted or rejected and a corrective action plan specifying responsible
224 parties and timetables for completion.
225 (2) Within 5 days of the conclusion of the review process, the Department shall transmit
226 the report to the Mayor, the D.C. Council, and the Corrections Information Council.
227 (3) The Department shall publish on its website written updates on the status of the
228 corrective action plan in 30-day intervals until the plan has been fully implemented.
229 (4) All staff involved in the incident should be offered critical incident stress debriefing.
230 Sec. 6. Plan and report on the elimination of prolonged confinement
10

231 (a) Within 90 days after the effective date of this act, the Department shall transmit to
232 the Mayor, the Council, and the Corrections Information Council, and publish on its website a
233 written report of its plans to effectuate this act.
234 (b) The report published under subsection (a) of this section shall include:
235 (1) The number of residents who have not received minimum out-of-cell time
236 over the prior 12 months; and
237 (2) The number of residents who have been placed in disciplinary housing,
238 medical isolation, or a safe cell over the prior 12 months.
239 (c) The report published under subsection (a) of this section shall include the following
240 deidentified information about each resident:
241 (1) The cumulative number of days each resident has not received minimum out-
242 of-cell time over the prior 12 months;
243 (2) The highest consecutive number of days each resident has not received
244 minimum out-of-cell time over the prior 12 months;
245 (3) The cumulative number of days each resident has been placed in disciplinary
246 housing, medical isolation, or a safe cell over the prior 12 months;
247 (4) The highest consecutive number of days each resident has been placed in
248 disciplinary housing, medical isolation, or a safe cell over the prior 12 months;
249 (5) The basis for denying the resident minimum out-out-of-cell time;
250 (6) The basis for placing the resident in disciplinary housing, medical isolation, or
251 a safe cell, including:
252 (A) The communicable disease that is the basis for medical isolation; and
253 (B) The number of documented assessments made by a qualified health
11

254 professional;
255 (7) The notice and procedures followed before denying the resident minimum out-
256 of-cell time;
257 (8) The notice and procedures followed before placing the resident in disciplinary
258 housing, medical isolation, or a safe cell;
259 (9) The timing and plan for restoring the resident’s out-of-cell time and any
260 known barriers to that transition; and
261 (10) The timing and plan for removing the resident from disciplinary housing,
262 medical isolation, or a safe cell, and any known barriers to that transition.
263 (d) Within 180 days after the effective date of this act, the Department shall promulgate
264 regulations and issue policy statements to amend the Department’s processes for and use of
265 prolonged confinement, medical isolation, and safe cells in accordance with this act;
266 (e) Within one year after the effective date of this act, and quarterly thereafter, the
267 Department shall submit to the Mayor, the Council, and the Corrections Information Council,
268 and make available on the Department’s website a written report of its use of prolonged
269 confinement, medical isolation, and safe cells.
270 (f) The reports published under subsection (e) of this section shall include deidentified
271 data on each resident placed in prolonged confinement, broken down by confinement that is the
272 result of medical isolation, a safe cell, or any other reason, for any amount of time during the
273 reporting period.
274 (g) The reports published under subsection (e) of this section shall include:
275 (1) Each resident’s age, sex, gender identity, sexual orientation or other LGBTQ
276 status, race, religion, and ethnicity;
12

277 (2) Whether or not each resident is diagnosed with a serious mental illness, as that
278 term is defined in the current edition of The Diagnostic and Statistical Manual of Mental
279 Disorders;
280 (3) Whether or not each resident is diagnosed with a physical disability, an
281 intellectual or developmental disability, a traumatic brain injury, or any other disability, as
282 defined in 42 U.S.C. § 12102;
283 (4) The location of the prolonged confinement, broken down by unit or type of
284 unit;
285 (5) The highest consecutive number of days that each resident was in prolonged
286 confinement;
287 (6) The cumulative number of days each resident was in prolonged confinement;
288 (7) The reasons each resident was subjected to prolonged confinement;
289 (8) Whether each resident was subject to any type of physical or chemical
290 restraint while in prolonged confinement; and
291 (9) Whether each resident remains in prolonged confinement as of the time the
292 report is finalized.
293 (h) The reports published under subsection (e) of this section shall include data on the
294 filing of grievances by people held in prolonged confinement, medical isolation, or a safe cell,
295 including:
296 (1) The total number of grievances filed, reported by type of grievance;
297 (2) The number of grievances closed during the reporting period, including the
298 reason for closure, and the number of grievances that remain open; and
299 (3) The average number of days from the filing of a grievance to final resolution,
13

300 broken down by Informal Grievance, Formal Grievance, Level 1 Appeal, Level 2 Appeal and
301 Prolonged Confinement Grievance.
302 (i) The reports published under subsection (e) of this section shall include data on assault
303 and self-harm, including:
304 (1) The total number of residents in medical isolation who committed self-harm,
305 attempted or completed suicide, were assaulted by another resident, were subjected to a use of
306 force by a Department employee, or received an incident report or disciplinary infraction, and the
307 type of that infraction; and
308 (2) The total number of residents in a safe cell who committed self-harm,
309 attempted or completed suicide, were assaulted by another resident, were subjected to a use of
310 force by a Department employee, or received an incident report or disciplinary infraction, and the
311 type of that infraction.
312 Sec. 7. Private right of action.
313 (a) A resident or former resident may bring a civil action in the Superior Court of the
314 District of Columbia against the District or any agent or employee thereof for violation of this act
315 or of any regulation promulgated or policy statement issued there under. Relief may include:
316 (1) Injunctive relief;
317 (2) Declaratory relief;
318 (3) Liquidated damages of $1000 per each day a resident is unlawfully held in
319 prolonged confinement;
320 (4) Compensatory damages; and
321 (5) Punitive damages.
322 (b) A resident or former resident who prevails in an action under this section shall be
14

323 entitled to fees and costs, including reasonable attorneys’ fees and reasonable expert fees.
324 (c) Notwithstanding any D.C. law, regulation, or policy to the contrary:
325 (1) The requirements of D.C. Code § 12-309 shall not apply to an action brought
326 under this act;
327 (2) The only administrative remedy available to raise questions of compliance
328 with or treatment under this act shall be filing a Prolonged Confinement Grievance at any time
329 directly with the Director of the Department, which has 5 calendar days to respond;
330 (3) The grievance shall be considered exhausted at the time the Director responds
331 or at the conclusion of 5 calendar days regardless of whether the Director provides a response.
332 (d) The Department shall provide the resident with a grievance form, writing utensils, and
333 access to the Inmate Grievance Procedure mailbox.
334 (e) Failure to provide a resident with a grievance form, writing utensils or access to the
335 grievance mailbox shall effectively render the grievance process unavailable to the resident.
336 (f) In an action under this section, a resident or former resident’s sworn statement
337 including facts that, if true, would be sufficient to show the resident or former resident had either
338 completed the grievance process or that the grievance process was unavailable to that resident,
339 shall create a rebuttable presumption that the grievance process was either completed or
340 unavailable that can only be overcome by clear and convincing evidence.
341 Sec. 8. Fiscal impact statement.
342 The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal
343 impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975,
344 approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
345 Sec. 9. Effective date.
15

346 This act shall take effect after approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
347 Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto), a 30-day period of congressional review as
348 provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December
349 24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)), and publication in the District of
350 Columbia Register.
16